Nevada, session 83, SB59.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 391 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. A person licensed pursuant to this chapter shall
not engage in sexual impropriety with, or actions that constitute
the grooming of a pupil:
(a) Who is enrolled in or attending the public school or private
school at which the licensee is employed;
(b) Who was enrolled in or attending a public school or private
school while the licensee was employed at that public school or
private school and who has ceased to be enrolled in or attending
that public school or private school for a period of less than 12
months;
(c) Who is or was enrolled in or attending a public school or
private school while the licensee was employed at that public
school or private school if the licensee has ceased to be employed
at that public school or private school for a period of less than 12
months; or
(d) With whom the licensee has had contact in the course of
performing his or her duties as a licensee if:
(1) The pupil is enrolled in or attending a public school or
private school or was enrolled in or attending a public school or
private school within the immediately preceding 12 months; or
(2) The licensee has ceased to be employed in a position
requiring a license pursuant to this chapter for a period of less
than 12 months.
2. Consent by a pupil to the conduct described in subsection 1
is not a defense in any proceeding brought in accordance with the
provisions of NRS 391.320 to 391.361, inclusive, and sections 2, 3
and 4 of this act, or against any disciplinary action taken pursuant
to NRS 391.650 to 391.826, inclusive.
3. In addition to any penalty prescribed by any other specific
statute, a person who violates this section is subject to disciplinary
action pursuant to NRS 391.330 or 391.750, or both.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Grooming” means:
(1) Engaging in a pattern of flirtatious behavior;
(2) Making an effort to gain unreasonable access to, or
time alone with, a pupil for no reasonable educational purpose;
-
*SB59*

– 4 –
(3) Engaging in behavior that can be reasonably construed
as involving inappropriate personal or intimate relationships with,
conduct toward or focus on a pupil; or
(4) Engaging in individualized and special treatment that is
not in compliance with generally accepted educational practices.
(b) “Sexual impropriety” includes, without limitation:
(1) Telling sexual jokes or stories;
(2) Engaging in sexual kidding or teasing;
(3) Using sexual innuendos or making comments
containing double entendre;
(4) Touching, either directly or through the clothing, of the
genitalia, anus, groin, breast, inner thigh or buttocks of a pupil;
(5) Using spoken, written or electronic communication
methods to:
(I) Importune, invite, participate with or entice a pupil
to expose or touch his or her genitals or pubic area or those of
another person; or
(II) Observe the genitals or pubic area of a pupil;
(6) Sexual advances or requests for sexual favors;
(7) A physically intimate, sexual or romantic relationship;
(8) Discussion of personal romantic or sexual feelings or
activities;
(9) Except in the context of providing professional teaching
or counseling services as required by a school district, discussion
of the romantic or sexual feelings or activities of a pupil;
(10) Displaying, sharing or transmitting materials which
are pornographic or sexually explicit and which lack serious
literary, artistic, political or scientific value;
(11) Unless it is required to protect the safety of a pupil, any
physical contact with a pupil that the pupil has previously
indicated is unwelcome;
(12) Except as necessary to address violations of a dress
code, referencing the physical appearance or clothing of a pupil in
a way that could be reasonably interpreted as sexual;
(13) Self-disclosure or physical exposure of a sexual,
romantic or erotic nature; or
(14) Any act committed with the intent of arousing,
appealing to or gratifying the lust, passions or sexual desires of a
person licensed pursuant to this chapter.
Sec. 3. 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction may
place an administrative hold on a license issued pursuant to this
chapter, pending further disciplinary proceedings by the State
Board pursuant to NRS 391.320 to 391.361, inclusive, and
sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act, if:
(a) The licensee:
-
*SB59*

– 5 –
(1) Is arrested for, or charged with, a crime which may be a
ground for the suspension or revocation of the person’s license
pursuant to NRS 391.330; or
(2) Is suspended from employment for an alleged act that, if
proven, may be a ground for the suspension or revocation of the
person’s license pursuant to NRS 391.330; and
(b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction finds that the
alleged conduct presents a risk to the health, safety or welfare of
pupils.
2. If the Superintendent of Public Instruction places an
administrative hold pursuant to this section, the Superintendent of
Public Instruction shall immediately notify the licensee and
transmit to the State Board a notice of the administrative hold and
a recommendation to maintain the administrative hold.
Sec. 4. 1. A licensee who has an administrative hold placed
on his or her license by the Superintendent of Public Instruction
or the State Board:
(a) May, if employed by a school district or charter school at
the time the administrative hold was placed, continue to be so
employed at the discretion of the employing school district or
charter school, subject to the terms of any collective bargaining
agreement in effect between the licensee and his or her employer;
and
(b) Shall not seek employment with, or be employed by, any
other school district or charter school in this State while the
administrative hold is in effect.
2. An administrative hold must not be recorded as a
disciplinary action against the licensee in any permanent
employment record. The suspension or revocation of a license for
an act which served as the basis for the placement of an
administrative hold is a disciplinary action and may be recorded as
such in a permanent employment record.
3. If the Superintendent of Public Instruction or the State
Board places an administrative hold on a license issued pursuant
to this chapter, the Department shall:
(a) Notify the school district or charter school that employs the
licensee that an administrative hold has been placed.
(b) In the Educator Identification Clearinghouse maintained
by the National Association of State Directors of Teacher
Education and Certification or its successor organization, make
an entry indicating that an administrative hold has been placed on
the license and that such an action does not constitute a
disciplinary action against the licensee. If an administrative hold
is lifted, the Department shall amend the entry to indicate that the
administrative hold was lifted.
-
*SB59*

– 6 –
Sec. 5. NRS 391.033 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.033 1. All licenses for teachers and other educational
personnel are granted by the Superintendent of Public Instruction
pursuant to regulations adopted by the Commission and as
otherwise provided by law.
2. An application for the issuance of a license must include the
social security number of the applicant.
3. Every applicant for a license must submit with his or her
application:
(a) A complete set of his or her fingerprints and written
permission authorizing the Superintendent to forward the
fingerprints to the Central Repository for Nevada Records of
Criminal History for its initial report on the criminal history of the
applicant and for reports thereafter upon renewal of the license
pursuant to subsection 8 of NRS 179A.075, and for submission to
the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report on the criminal
history of the applicant; and
(b) Written authorization for the Superintendent to obtain any
information concerning the applicant that may be available from the
Statewide Central Registry and any equivalent registry maintained
by a governmental entity in a jurisdiction in which the applicant has
resided within the immediately preceding 5 years.
4. In conducting an investigation into the background of an
applicant for a license, the Superintendent may cooperate with any
appropriate law enforcement agency to obtain information relating
to the criminal history of the applicant, including, without
limitation, any record of warrants for the arrest of or applications for
protective orders against the applicant.
5. [The Superintendent may issue a provisional license pending
receipt of the reports of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the
Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History if the
Superintendent determines that the applicant is otherwise qualified.
6.] Except as otherwise provided in subsection [8,] 7, a license
must be issued to, or renewed for, as applicable, an applicant if:
(a) The Superintendent determines that the applicant is
qualified;
(b) The information obtained by the Superintendent pursuant to
subsections 3 and 4:
(1) Does not indicate that the applicant has been convicted of
a felony or any offense involving moral turpitude or indicates that
the applicant has been convicted of a felony or an offense involving
moral turpitude but the Superintendent determines that the
conviction is unrelated to the position within the county school
district or charter school for which the applicant applied or for
which he or she is currently employed, as applicable;
-
*SB59*

– 7 –
(2) Does not indicate that there has been a substantiated
report of abuse or neglect of a child, as defined in NRS 432B.020,
or a violation of NRS 201.540, 201.553, 201.560, 392.4633 or
394.366 made against the applicant in any state; and
(3) Does not indicate that the applicant has a warrant for his
or her arrest; and
(c) For initial licensure, the applicant submits the statement
required pursuant to NRS 391.034.
[7.] 6. If, pursuant to subparagraph (2) of paragraph (b) of
subsection [6,] 5, the information indicates that a substantiated
report has been made against the applicant in any state, the
Superintendent shall:
(a) Suspend the application process;
(b) Notify the applicant of the substantiated report; and
(c) Provide the applicant an opportunity to rebut the
substantiated report.
[8.] 7. The Superintendent may deny an application for a
license pursuant to this section if:
(a) A report on the criminal history of the applicant from the
Federal Bureau of Investigation or the Central Repository for
Nevada Records of Criminal History indicates that the applicant has
been arrested for or charged with a sexual offense involving a minor
or pupil, including, without limitation, any attempt, solicitation or
conspiracy to commit such an offense; and
(b) The Superintendent provides to the applicant:
(1) Written notice of his or her intent to deny the application;
and
(2) An opportunity for the applicant to have a hearing.
[9.] 8. To request a hearing pursuant to subsection [8,] 7, an
applicant must submit a written request to the Superintendent within
15 days after receipt of the notice by the applicant. Such a hearing
must be conducted in accordance with regulations adopted by the
State Board. If no request for a hearing is filed within that time, the
Superintendent may deny the license.
[10.] 9. If the Superintendent denies an application for a
license pursuant to this section, the Superintendent must, within 15
days after the date on which the application is denied, provide notice
of the denial to the school district or charter school that employs the
applicant if the applicant is employed by a school district or charter
school. Such a notice must not state the reasons for denial.
[11.] 10. The Superintendent may not be held liable for
damages resulting from any action of the Superintendent authorized
by subsection 4.
-
*SB59*

– 8 –
[12.] 11. The Superintendent may enter into reciprocal
agreements with appropriate officials of other countries concerning
the licensing of teachers.
[13.] 12. As used in this section, “sexual offense” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 179D.097.
Sec. 6. NRS 391.033 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.033 1. All licenses for teachers and other educational
personnel are granted by the Superintendent of Public Instruction
pursuant to regulations adopted by the Commission and as
otherwise provided by law.
2. Every applicant for a license must submit with his or her
application:
(a) A complete set of his or her fingerprints and written
permission authorizing the Superintendent to forward the
fingerprints to the Central Repository for Nevada Records of
Criminal History for its initial report on the criminal history of the
applicant and for reports thereafter upon renewal of the license
pursuant to subsection 8 of NRS 179A.075, and for submission to
the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report on the criminal
history of the applicant; and
(b) Written authorization for the Superintendent to obtain any
information concerning the applicant that may be available from the
Statewide Central Registry and any equivalent registry maintained
by a governmental entity in a jurisdiction in which the applicant has
resided within the immediately preceding 5 years.
3. [The Superintendent may issue a provisional license pending
receipt of the reports if the Superintendent determines that the
applicant is otherwise qualified.
4.] In conducting an investigation into the background of an
applicant for a license, the Superintendent may cooperate with any
appropriate law enforcement agency to obtain information relating
to the criminal history of the applicant, including, without
limitation, any record of warrants for the arrest of or applications for
protective orders against the applicant.
[5.] 4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [7,] 6, a
license must be issued to, or renewed for, as applicable, an applicant
if the Superintendent determines that the applicant is qualified and
the information obtained by the Superintendent pursuant to
subsections 2 and [4:] 3:
(a) Does not indicate that the applicant has been convicted of a
felony or any offense involving moral turpitude or the
Superintendent determines, in his or her discretion, that any
conviction indicated in the reports on the criminal history of the
applicant is unrelated to the position within the county school
-
*SB59*

– 9 –
district or charter school for which the applicant applied or for
which he or she is currently employed, as applicable;
(b) Does not indicate that there has been a substantiated report
of abuse or neglect of a child, as defined in NRS 432B.020, or a
violation of NRS 201.540, [or] 201.553, 201.560, 392.4633 or
394.366 made against the applicant in any state; and
(c) Does not indicate that the applicant has a warrant for his or
her arrest.
[6.] 5. If, pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection [5,] 4, the
information indicates that a substantiated report has been made
against the applicant in any state, the Superintendent shall:
(a) Suspend the application process;
(b) Notify the applicant of the substantiated report; and
(c) Provide the applicant an opportunity to rebut the
substantiated report.
[7.] 6. The Superintendent may deny an application for a
license pursuant to this section if:
(a) A report on the criminal history of the applicant from the
Federal Bureau of Investigation or the Central Repository for
Nevada Records of Criminal History indicates that the applicant has
been arrested for or charged with a sexual offense involving a minor
or pupil, including, without limitation, any attempt, solicitation or
conspiracy to commit such an offense; and
(b) The Superintendent provides to the applicant:
(1) Written notice of his or her intent to deny the application;
and
(2) An opportunity for the applicant to have a hearing.
[8.] 7. To request a hearing pursuant to subsection [7,] 6, an
applicant must submit a written request to the Superintendent within
15 days after receipt of the notice by the applicant. Such a hearing
must be conducted in accordance with regulations adopted by the
State Board. If no request for a hearing is filed within that time, the
Superintendent may deny the license.
[9.] 8. If the Superintendent denies an application for a license
pursuant to this section, the Superintendent must, within 15 days
after the date on which the application is denied, provide notice of
the denial to the school district or charter school that employs the
applicant if the applicant is employed by a school district or charter
school. Such a notice must not state the reasons for denial.
[10.] 9. The Superintendent may not be held liable for
damages resulting from any action of the Superintendent authorized
by subsection [4.] 3.
[11.] 10. The Superintendent may enter into reciprocal
agreements with appropriate officials of other countries concerning
the licensing of teachers.
-
*SB59*

– 10 –
[12.] 11. As used in this section, “sexual offense” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 179D.097.
Sec. 7. NRS 391.055 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.055 1. The Department shall adopt regulations that
establish a procedure for the notification, tracking and monitoring of
the status of criminal cases involving persons who are licensed
pursuant to this chapter. The procedure must include, without
limitation:
(a) A method by which the superintendent of schools of a school
district and the administrative head of a charter school must notify
the Department in a timely manner of the arrest of a person who is
licensed pursuant to this chapter if:
(1) The act for which the licensee is arrested:
(I) May be a ground for the suspension or revocation of
the person’s license pursuant to NRS 391.330; and
(II) Is not excluded by the Department from the
notification requirements of this section; and
(2) The school district or charter school has knowledge of
that arrest.
(b) A method by which the superintendent of schools of a school
district and the administrative head of a charter school must notify
the Department in a timely manner of:
(1) Each action, if any, taken against the licensee by the
school district or charter school after the arrest; and
(2) The conviction of the licensee, if the licensee is convicted
of the act for which he or she was arrested.
(c) The steps that the Department must follow in response to the
receipt of notice pursuant to this section, including, without
limitation, the preparation of a separate file on the licensee for the
documentation and monitoring of the status of the case.
2. Each file that is maintained on a licensee pursuant to
subsection 1 must include, without limitation:
(a) The date on which the person was arrested and the date on
which the Department received notice of the arrest from the school
district or charter school;
(b) The reason why the licensee was arrested;
(c) The steps taken by the Department in response to all notices
received by the Department from a school district or charter school
pursuant to subsection 1;
(d) An indication whether the case was referred to the Attorney
General’s office for review and the date of the referral, if any;
(e) An indication whether the Superintendent of Public
Instruction has presented the case to the State Board for action and
the type of action recommended by the Superintendent, if any;
-
*SB59*

– 11 –
(f) A description of any action taken by the State Board against
the licensee and the reason for that action or, if no action is taken by
the State Board, the reason for the inaction; and
(g) The final resolution of the case and the date of resolution.
3. If the Department receives notice of a conviction of a
licensee and the conviction is for an act which is a ground for the
suspension or revocation of a license, the Superintendent of Public
Instruction shall immediately recommend that the State Board
[proceed] suspend or revoke the license in accordance with the
provisions of NRS 391.320 to 391.361, inclusive [.] , and sections
2, 3 and 4 of this act.
4. If the Department maintains a file on a licensee pursuant to
this section and the State Board determines that there is not
sufficient evidence to suspend or revoke the license, the file and any
related documents must not be made a part of that licensee’s
permanent employment record.
Sec. 8. NRS 391.3015 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.3015 1. Except as otherwise provided by subsection 3, if
the license of an employee lapses during a time that school is in
session:
(a) The school district that employs him or her shall provide
written notice to the employee of the lapse of the employee’s license
and of the provisions of this section;
(b) The employee must not be suspended from employment for
the lapsed license for a period of 90 days after the date of the notice
pursuant to paragraph (a) or the end of the school year, whichever is
longer; and
(c) The employee’s license shall be deemed valid for the period
described in paragraph (b) for purposes of the employee’s continued
employment with the school district during that period.
2. If a school district complies with subsection 1 and an
employee fails to reinstate his or her license within the time
prescribed in paragraph (b) of subsection 1, his or her employment
shall be deemed terminated at the end of the period described in
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 and the school district is not otherwise
required to comply with NRS 391.301 to 391.309, inclusive.
3. The provisions of this section do not apply to an employee
whose:
(a) License has been placed on an administrative hold or has
been suspended or revoked by the State Board pursuant to NRS
391.320 to 391.361, inclusive [;] , and sections 2, 3 and 4 of this
act; or
(b) Application for renewal was denied by the Superintendent of
Public Instruction pursuant to NRS 391.033.
-
*SB59*

– 12 –
Sec. 9. NRS 391.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.320 The State Board of Education may place on
administrative hold or suspend or revoke the license of any teacher
for any cause specified by law.
Sec. 10. NRS 391.322 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.322 1. If the board of trustees of a school district, the
governing body of a charter school or the Superintendent of Public
Instruction or the Superintendent’s designee submits a
recommendation to the State Board for the suspension or revocation
of a license issued pursuant to this chapter [,] or the Superintendent
of Public Instruction submits a recommendation to maintain an
administrative hold placed by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction on a license pursuant to section 3 of this act, the State
Board shall send written notice of the recommendation to the person
to whom the license has been issued at the address on file with the
Department.
2. A notice given pursuant to subsection 1 must contain:
(a) A statement of the charge upon which the recommendation is
based;
(b) A copy of the recommendation received by the State Board;
(c) A statement that the licensee is entitled to a hearing before a
hearing officer if the licensee makes a written request for the
hearing as provided by subsection 3; [and]
(d) If an administrative hold has been placed on a license
pursuant to section 3 of this act, the effective date of the
administrative hold; and
(e) A statement that the grounds and procedure for the
placement of an administrative hold on or the suspension or
revocation of a license are set forth in NRS 391.320 to 391.361,
inclusive [.] , and sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act.
3. A licensee to whom notice has been given pursuant to this
section may request a hearing before a hearing officer selected
pursuant to subsection 4. Such a request must be in writing and must
be filed with the Superintendent of Public Instruction within 15 days
after receipt of the notice by the licensee.
4. Upon receipt of a request filed pursuant to subsection 3, the
Superintendent of Public Instruction shall request from the Hearings
Division of the Department of Administration a list of potential
hearing officers. The licensee requesting a hearing and the
Superintendent of Public Instruction shall select a person to serve as
hearing officer from the list provided by the Hearings Division of
the Department of Administration by alternately striking one name
until the name of only one hearing officer remains. The
Superintendent of Public Instruction shall strike the first name.
-
*SB59*

– 13 –
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, if no request
for a hearing is filed within the time specified in subsection 3, the
State Board may maintain an administrative hold on the license,
suspend or revoke the license or take no action on the
recommendation. If the State Board takes no action on a
recommendation to maintain an administrative hold placed by the
Superintendent of Public Instruction, the administrative hold is
lifted.
6. If the Department receives notice of a conviction of a
licensee and the conviction is for an act which is a ground for the
suspension or revocation of a license, the State Board shall
immediately process the recommendation for the suspension or
revocation in accordance with the provisions of NRS 391.320 to
391.361, inclusive [.] , and sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act. If no
request for a hearing is filed within the time specified in subsection
3, the State Board may accept, reject or modify the
recommendation.
7. If the State Board maintains an administrative hold placed
by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the administrative
hold remains in effect until the earlier of the date on which:
(a) The administrative hold is removed by the State Board
upon the determination of the State Board that there is not
sufficient evidence to suspend or revoke the license for the alleged
act for which the administrative hold was placed;
(b) The State Board suspends or revokes the license in
accordance with the provisions of NRS 391.320 to 391.361,
inclusive, and sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act; or
(c) The administrative hold expires, which occurs 1 year after
the date on which the administrative hold was originally placed or
maintained by the State Board.
Sec. 11. NRS 391.323 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.323 1. Unless the parties agree to a later date, within 30
days after the selection of a hearing officer pursuant to NRS
391.322, the hearing officer shall conduct a hearing. Within 15 days
after the conclusion of the hearing, the hearing officer shall prepare
and file with the Superintendent of Public Instruction a report
containing:
(a) A recommendation as to whether the license of the licensee
should have or continue to have an administrative hold placed on
it or be suspended or revoked; and
(b) Findings of fact and conclusions of law which support the
recommendation.
2. The State Board may accept or reject the recommendation or
refer the report back to the hearing officer for further evidence and
recommendation, and shall notify the teacher, administrator or other
-
*SB59*

– 14 –
licensed employee in writing of its decision. [The] Except for a
decision to maintain an administrative hold, the decision of the
State Board is a final decision in a contested case.
Sec. 12. NRS 391.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.330 1. The State Board may suspend or revoke the
license of any teacher, administrator or other licensed employee, or
may issue a letter of reprimand to any teacher, administrator or other
licensed employee, after notice and an opportunity for hearing have
been provided pursuant to NRS 391.322 and 391.323, for:
(a) Unprofessional conduct.
(b) Immorality, as defined in NRS 391.650.
(c) Evident unfitness for service.
(d) Physical or mental incapacity which renders the teacher,
administrator or other licensed employee unfit for service.
(e) Conviction of a felony or crime involving moral turpitude.
(f) Conviction of a sex offense under NRS 200.366, 200.368,
201.190, 201.220, 201.230, 201.540 or 201.560 in which a pupil
enrolled in a school of a county school district was the victim.
(g) A violation of section 2 of this act.
(h) Conviction of a violation of NRS 201.553.
[(h)] (i) Knowingly advocating the overthrow of the Federal
Government or of the State of Nevada by force, violence or
unlawful means.
[(i)] (j) Persistent defiance of or refusal to obey the regulations
of the State Board, the Commission or the Superintendent of Public
Instruction, defining and governing the duties of teachers,
administrators and other licensed employees.
[(j)] (k) Breaches in the security or confidentiality of the
questions and answers of the examinations that are administered
pursuant to NRS 390.105 and the college and career readiness
assessment administered pursuant to NRS 390.610.
[(k)] (l) Intentional failure to observe and carry out the
requirements of a plan to ensure the security of examinations and
assessments adopted pursuant to NRS 390.270 or 390.275.
[(l)] (m) An intentional violation of NRS 388.497 or 388.499.
[(m)] (n) Knowingly and willfully failing to comply with the
provisions of NRS 388.1351.
[(n)] (o) A substantiated report of abuse or neglect of a child, as
defined in NRS 432B.020, or a violation of NRS 201.540, 201.553,
201.560, 392.4633 or 394.366 made against the applicant in any
state.
(p) A violation of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of section 4 of
this act.
2. The State Board may, after notice and an opportunity for
hearing have been provided pursuant to NRS 391.322 and
-
*SB59*

– 15 –
391.323, maintain an administrative hold on a license issued
pursuant to this chapter, pending further disciplinary proceedings
by the State Board pursuant to NRS 391.320 to 391.361, inclusive,
and sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act if:
(a) The licensee:
(1) Is arrested for, or charged with, a crime which may be a
ground for the suspension or revocation of the person’s license
pursuant to this section; or
(2) Is suspended from employment for an alleged act that, if
proven, may be a ground for the suspension or revocation of the
person’s license pursuant to this section; and
(b) The State Board finds that the alleged conduct presents a
risk to the health, safety or welfare of pupils.
3. The State Board shall adopt regulations governing the
process by which a letter of reprimand may be issued to a teacher,
administrator or other licensed employee pursuant to this section,
including, without limitation, regulations concerning the time period
during which a letter of reprimand will remain on the record of the
teacher, administrator or other licensed employee.
[3.] 4. A teacher, administrator or other licensed employee
whose license is suspended pursuant to this section:
(a) May apply to reinstate his or her license after the period of
suspension, as determined by the State Board, is completed; and
(b) If he or she applies to reinstate his or her license pursuant to
paragraph (a), shall:
(1) Submit a new application for licensure to the Department;
and
(2) Pay the appropriate fee for licensure.
[4.] 5. A teacher, administrator or other licensed employee
whose license is revoked may not apply to reinstate his or her
license and the Department shall not grant a new license to such a
person.
Sec. 13. NRS 391.355 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.355 1. The State Board shall adopt rules of procedure for
the conduct of hearings conducted pursuant to NRS 391.323.
2. The rules of procedure must provide for boards of trustees of
school districts, governing bodies of charter schools or the
Superintendent of Public Instruction or the Superintendent’s
designee to bring charges, when cause exists.
3. The rules of procedure must provide that:
(a) The licensed employee, board of trustees of a school district,
governing body of a charter school and Superintendent are entitled
to be heard, to be represented by an attorney and to call witnesses in
their behalf.
-
*SB59*

– 16 –
(b) The hearing officer selected pursuant to NRS 391.322 is
entitled to be reimbursed for his or her reasonable actual expenses.
(c) If requested by the hearing officer selected pursuant to NRS
391.322, an official transcript must be made.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (e), the State
Board, licensed employee and the Department, board of trustees of a
school district or governing body of a charter school which initiated
the complaint resulting in the hearing are equally responsible for the
expense of and compensation for the hearing officer selected
pursuant to NRS 391.322 and the expense of the official transcript.
The State Board may bill the licensed employee or the Department,
board of trustees of a school district or governing body of a charter
school which initiated the complaint resulting in the hearing for
their percentage of any expenses incurred pursuant to this
paragraph.
(e) If the hearing results from a recommendation to revoke or
suspend a license based upon a conviction which is a ground for the
suspension or revocation of a license pursuant to paragraph (e), (f)
or [(g)] (h) of subsection 1 of NRS 391.330, the licensed employee
is fully responsible for the expense of and compensation for the
hearing officer selected pursuant to NRS 391.322 and the expense of
the official transcript. The State Board may bill the licensed
employee for such expenses.
4. A hearing officer selected pursuant to NRS 391.322 shall,
upon the request of a party, issue subpoenas to compel the
attendance of witnesses and the production of books, records,
documents or other pertinent information to be used as evidence in
hearings conducted pursuant to NRS 391.323.
Sec. 14. This act becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
H
-
*SB59*